 “We now have 4-month-old mice that had diabetes and now don’t have any more,” he added.
 Dr. Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical and Scientific Department, cautioned that the research is still in its infancy.
 Like some other experts, he was skeptical about whether it was possible to cure diabetes, and pointed out that the findings for people who already had type 1 diabetes were not relevant.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, Permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Literature Prize Committee, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the committee had given up its efforts to inform Bob Dylan of his honor with the Literature Prize for Literature after it was not possible to reach him personally.
 Danius said: "At the moment we are not doing anything. I have called his closest collaborator and sent him emails and very friendly answers. That is preliminary enough."
 Rings CEO Jamie Siminoff once said he founded the company after he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage workshop.
 He said he had built a WLAN doorbell.
 Siminoff said sales have soared since his appearance on a 2013 episode of “Shark Tank,” even though the show’s judges rejected his startup’s funding.
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the shopping channel QVC.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm ADT Corporation.
 While an experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola mortality, there are currently no drugs that have been proven to be clearly suitable for treating existing infections.
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially looked promising, but formal studies showed that it offered fewer benefits than hoped in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp served as a control, meaning the scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity that the Olympic family stand up for a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that the interests of our athletes and clubs and their sport are better served by making meaningful changes within our organization rather than decertification.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light how abuse on the scale described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could go unchecked for so long and welcomes all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal - to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes so they can follow their dreams in a safe, positive and self-determined environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F. Kennedy and then for the government around Lyndon B. Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as National Security Advisor (NSA) in succession to Henry Kissinger.
 As national security adviser, he supported Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film with Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone has received nominations in all major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Further nominations are for example for the best film, the direction, the camera work, the costume design, the editing, the original film music, the production design, the sound editing, the sound mixing and the original script.
 Two songs from the movie, Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars, were nominated for Best Original Song. Lionsgate Studio received 26 nominations – more than any other film studio.
 Late Sunday, President Donald Trump announced in a statement read by the press secretary that US troops would leave Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone conversation between Trump and Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the surveillance of captured ISIS fighters, whose repatriation, the statement said, was rejected by European countries.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that is already widespread, but also provides details that fossils in general cannot provide, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say that the feathers of this bird were brown on the upper side and light or carotinoid on the underside.
 The find also provides insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because the dinosaur feathers lack a well-developed shaft, called the rachis, but possess other features of feathers – barbs and barbules – the researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flying, but rather for temperature regulation or for showing off. The researchers speculated that the sample, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, shows the plumage of an adult and not the down of a chick.
 The researchers claimed that, although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample shows the feathers of an adult and not downy feathers.
 A car bomb detonated this morning in the police headquarters of the Turkish Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty other people.
 According to the governor's office, nineteen of the injured are police officers.
 Police said they suspect a militant supporter of Daesh (ISIL) was behind the attack.
 They have discovered that the sun works on the same basic principles as other stars: It has been discovered that the activity of all stars in the system is driven by their luminosity, rotation and nothing else.
 To determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma flow, the luminosity and the rotation are jointly included.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of reversals of the magnetic field.
 During the journey, Iwasaki ran into difficulties on many occasions.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard runs on the frequencies 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 This allows it to be backwards compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has Dual-Radio.
 The speed of 802.11 n is significantly faster than that of the predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall, married and with two grown children, did not make a big impression on Miller, who was told the story.
 "When asked about a comment, Miller said: ""Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I prepared and could not really hear what he said."""
 "We will strive to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020 compared with the level of 2005," Hu said.
 He did not give a figure for the cuts, but said they would be made on the basis of China's economic performance.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to “avoid the old path of first polluting and then cleaning up, to avoid”.
 He added that “they should not, however, be asked to make commitments that go beyond their level of development, their responsibilities and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Study Group presented its report today at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any course of action in Iraq at this point will stop sectarian warfare, growing violence or a slide into chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and consensus building in the US on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive in Iraq and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and Argentine First Lady Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner announced her presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Mrs Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine theatre, where she also began her 2005 campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 "The trigger for the debate was a controversy over spending for disaster relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives have jokingly referred to as "Bush's New Orleans deal."
 The criticism of the Liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that contracts for the reconstruction were awarded to alleged insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of participants was so large that it was not possible for everyone to get access to the burial on St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up in various locations in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were installed, which were seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's earlier policy of concentrating its resources on easily solved cases, particularly car theft, in an effort to increase the agency's success rate.
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the funding of the anti-obscenity initiative and stipulated that the FBI must employ 10 agents for adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest innings score, 70 runs in only 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good form and put on a partnership of 100 runs.
 But after losing the captain's gate, India scored only 36 rounds and lost 7 wickets, with which the innings were over.
 The US president George W. Bush arrived in Singapore in the morning of November 16 and began a one-week trip through Asia.
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, Singapore's Prime Minister, about trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of losses in the midterm election, Bush told the audience about expanding trade in Asia.
 "Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed after a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton on Tuesday in the PMO to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee of all parties for review before the second reading."
 Layton had demanded changes to the Conservative government's environmental legislation at the meeting with the prime minister, and called for a "thorough and complete rewrite" of the Conservative Party's environmental legislation.
 After the Federal Government stepped in to fund the Mersey Hospital in Devonport (Tasmania), the state government and some parliamentarians have criticized the move as a PR stunt ahead of the November federal election.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the A$45 million (US$30 million) would only be used to keep hospitals from being downgraded by the Tasmanian government.
 According to the current bulletin, the measurements of the sea level indicated that a tsunami was triggered. Near Pago Pago and Niue, a clear tsunami activity was recorded.
 No significant damage or injuries were reported from Tonga, but power was out for a time, which was reportedly the reason the Tongan authorities did not receive the PTWC tsunami warning.
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are on or near coastlines were closed all day Wednesday, even though the warnings had been lifted.
 U.S. President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 "Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean pledge "an important step towards the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.""
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, subtropical storm Jerry, has formed in the Atlantic Ocean today.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) says that at this time, Jerry does not pose a threat to land.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could break the already damaged dams.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to 20 feet high during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing knee-deep water as the nearby levee was breached.
 On a 100 foot long section water runs over the dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment about the distances when he spoke with Wikinews last month.
 “He [Wales] basically lied to us from the beginning. Firstly, by pretending it was for legal reasons. Secondly, by pretending he was listening, right up until he wiped the slate clean.”
 The community's irritations led to the current efforts to draft a policy regarding sexual content for the website, which hosts millions of open-licensed media.
 The work was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations made by the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team sought would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 Just as the moon attracts the earth and causes the tides, the milky way also exerts gravitational forces on the Sagittarius galaxy.
 The scientists concluded that dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way as normal matter.
 This theory states that most of the dark matter is in a kind of halo around a galaxy and is made up of many small particles.
 Television reports show white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are urging residents near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioners and not drink tap water.
 According to Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant.
 Authorities speculate that this may indicate that containers with uranium fuel at the site could have been torn and possibly leak.
 The extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) was discovered by Dr. Tony Moll in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 "In an interview, he said the new variant was 'extremely worrying and alarming because of the very high mortality rate.'"
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, Dr. Moll said, and at least two were medical staff.
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Nevertheless, the proportion of XDR-TB in the total group of people with tuberculosis is apparently still low; 6,000 of the total 330,000 people who are infected at a given time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which both weighed more than 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the Earth at a cruising speed of about 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was huge.
 They are still trying to figure out how extensive the collision was and how it will affect the earth.
 The United States Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The result of the plotting analysis is published on a public website.
 A doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder after her dead mother was discovered in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, Ohio authorities said.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground beside the road in T-shirt and underwear, apparently under the influence of drugs, in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-soaked blankets.
 Police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported at the end of July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then moves through mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak of the disease prompted the Indian government to hire pig catchers in heavily affected areas, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spray pesticides.
 The government has also promised several million bottles of vaccine against meningitis, which will help to arm the health authorities for the next year.
 Plans for vaccines to be delivered to the hardest-hit areas this year were delayed due to lack of funding and low priority setting compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where he began working in the Swedish Post Office three years later and became its chief engraver.
 He produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few generally known names in the field of philately, and some collectors specialize exclusively in his work.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year 2000, shows the magnificent painting "Glorious Deeds of Swedish Kings" by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl and is listed in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He was also involved in the design of banknotes for many countries, and current examples of his work include the portraits of the Prime Ministers on the front of the Canadian $5 and $100 banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital, but he died shortly thereafter.
 The truck driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident at approximately 12:00 GMT the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the accident site said: "There were children waiting to cross the road, and everyone was screaming and crying."
 They all ran back from the accident site.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less environmentally damaging ways.
 The United Nations also hopes to be able to set up a fund to help the countries affected by global warming to cope with the effects.
 The money could be used for flood-resistant houses, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some, women who wanted to speak about women's health, were not successful in overshadowing.
 She came to this conclusion because of the numerous positive comments and encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives be considered a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining inmates remained in the yard and refused to return to their cells.
 The negotiators tried to defuse the situation, but the prisoners' demands are unclear.
 Between 10:00 p.m. and 11:00 a.m. MDT, a fire was set by the inmates in the courtyard.
 Soon, police officers equipped with gas masks entered the premises and pushed the inmates into a corner with tear gas.
 The fire department was finally able to extinguish the fire at 23:35.
 After the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal flooding that distributes sediment in the river came to a halt.
 This sediment was necessary to form sandbanks and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two fish species have become extinct and two more are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 Authorities hope the rise in water level after the flood is enough to restore eroded sandbars downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Jakarta Geophysics Agency, there will be no tsunami warning as the earthquake did not reach the necessary magnitude of 6.5.
 Although there was no tsunami threat, residents panicked and began to leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey shed tears at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 "This will not be a farewell. This is the end of a chapter and the beginning of a new chapter."
 The final results of the presidential and parliamentary elections in Namibia indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a wide margin.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organisation (SWAPO), retained a majority in the parliamentary elections.
 Coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support.
 The crash occurred high up in mountainous terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Medecines Sans Frontieres and the World Health Organization say this is the worst outbreak the country has seen.
 "Richard Veerman, spokesman for Doctors Without Borders, said: "Angola is heading for the worst outbreak ever, and the situation in Angola is still very bad.""
 The games started at 10:00 am in great weather and apart from a little drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared, it was an ideal day for 7s rugby.
 South Africa, the top-ranked team in the tournament, started with a comfortable 26:00 win against Zambia, the fifth-ranked team.
 Although the team definitely looked rusty in the game against their southern sisters, South Africa improved steadily throughout the tournament.
 Their disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be beaten.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and poses a public health risk because it could fall at any time.
 It was due to be passed on Tuesday but was saved by an emergency court ruling.
 All cave entrances, also called "The Seven Sisters", have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet).
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, indicating that they are probably caves.
 ""They are colder during the day than the surrounding surface and warmer at night."
 "Their thermal behavior is not as uniform as that of larger caves on Earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature, but it does match that of deep holes in the ground," said Glen Cushing of the Astrogeology Team of the United States Geological Survey (USGS) and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff, Arizona. "
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: Voters isolate themselves in a booth and drop a pre-printed sheet of paper, on which the candidate of their choice is written, into an envelope.
 After the officials have confirmed the identity of the voter, the voter throws the envelope into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French election law lays down the procedure quite strictly.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes have had to be transparent so that voters and observers can attest that there are no envelopes at the beginning of the election and that no envelopes are inserted, except those of the properly counted and authorized voters.
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision and special procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously released worldwide on the basis of savings and functionality factors, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month trade show in 2007.
 But the consumer market for laptop computers will change radically after ASUS was honored by Manager Yuan from the Republic of China with the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007.
 The station's website describes the show as "Old-school radio theater with a new and eerie twisted interpretation!"
 In its early days, the show was only shown on the veteran Internet radio site TogiNet Radio, a site that focuses on talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet founded the subsidiary AstroNet Radio.
 The show originally had local amateur voice actors from East Texas.
 Reports said that extensive looting continued into the night, while police officers showed no presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 "According to one observer, Bishkek was descending into a state of 'anarchy' as gangs of people roamed the streets and looted consumer goods stores."
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the demonstrators from the south for the lawlessness.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand) in a rugby union match in the Tri Nations tournament at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a win by one point, 21 to 20, which ended the All Blacks' winning streak of 15 games.
 For the Springboks, a five-game losing streak came to an end.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final of the tournament will be held next week at Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will face Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 No immediate reports of damage were received by the United States Geological Survey (USGS) and its National Earthquake Information Center.
 The epicenter of the earthquake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the human-killing bird flu H5N1 has infected a wild duck that was found dead on Monday in a marshland near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country of the European Union to be affected by the virus; after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for "widespread death, destruction and terrorization of many millions of earth inhabitants."
 Chambers, an agnostic, argued that his suit was "frivolous" and that "anyone can sue anyone."
 The story presented in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens is about an artist, "whose life is determined by love for drugs and Japan."
 So the actors on stage smoke cannabis joints and the theater itself encourages the audience to join in.
 Former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann each reached the fourth, fifth and sixth place.
 After the results were in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but had harsh words for Romney, whose name was used in negative campaign ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 "Perry said he would 'return to Texas to evaluate the results of tonight's primary and to decide whether there is a continuing role for me in this race,'" but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames straw poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he subsequently died.
 He was reportedly in his 20s. In a statement, Bieber said, "While I was not present at this tragic accident nor was I directly involved, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 The entertainment news website TMZ has learned that the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and tried to take photos of the police stop before he crossed the street and kept going, which prompted the California Highway Patrol officer conducting the traffic stop to order him back across the street twice.
 According to the police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will probably not be charged.
 Since only eighteen medals are available per day, a number of countries have not made it to the podium.
 These include the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's super-G yesterday, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same competition.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G for men, and the Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek was sixteenth in the seated Super-G for men.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in fifteenth in the men's Super-G (seated). The New Zealander Adam Hall came in ninth in the men's Super-G (standing).
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished thirteenth in the Super-G. South Korean skier Jong Seork Park finished twenty-fourth in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are blamed for the spread of the disease, which broke out near the troops' camp.
 According to the complaint, the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the tributary of the Artibonit River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the troops arrived, no problems related to the disease had occurred in Haiti since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy has cited independent studies that suggest the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion unwittingly brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by the Blue Helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University Hospital admitted the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola virus occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control protocols, including separating the patient from others to avoid infection of third parties.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon had worked on several shows in various capacities.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like "Taxi", "Cheers" and "The Tracey Ullman Show".
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening create "The Simpsons" and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive licensing fees in the double-digit millions each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency Xinhua reported the planned hijacking of an aircraft.
 Later reports said the plane had received a bomb threat and was diverted to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 The first reports say that the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was refused permission to land in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are frequent in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have meant that no new aircraft can be bought.
 Three people were killed and three others injured in a helicopter crash at the beginning of the week.
 Last month Iran suffered its worst air disaster in years when a passenger plane crashed on its way to Armenia, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 In the same month, another passenger plane overshot the end of a runway in Maschhad and collided with a wall, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler injured himself during a performance on August 5, they canceled the tour.
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak, after both men had held every single service game in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but this time a tie-break was required after the 6:6 was reached.
 Potros's shoulder has been treated, but he was able to return to the field.
 The program began at 20:30 local time (15:00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country presented Bhajans, devotional songs, to Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by singer Raju Khandelwal.
 Lakkha Singh then took over the leadership in singing the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism 56 different edible things like sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes etc. which are offered to the deity).
 Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan. The singer Raju Khandelwal accompanied him.
 At the Tokyo Game Show keynote presentation on Thursday, Nintendo president Satoru Iwata revealed the controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution console.
 Similar to a TV remote control, the controller uses two sensors that are placed near the user's television to triangulate the user's position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire early in the race.
 His teammate led most of the race, but ended it shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a badly crushed right front wheel.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the suspension from the numerous battles during the race.
 "She's very sweet and she sings pretty well," he said, according to a transcript of the press conference.
 "I was moved to the core by every rehearsal for this."
 About three minutes after takeoff, a camera showed numerous pieces of insulating foam falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, it is not believed that they damaged the shuttle in any way.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., head of NASA's shuttle program, said the foam "fell off after the time we were concerned about."
 After five minutes, the wind picks up, about a minute later the wind reaches 70 km/h... Then it starts to rain, but the drops are so hard and large that they sting the skin. Then hail fell from the sky, people panicked, screamed and ran around.
 "I lost my sister and her friend, and on my way there were two disabled people in wheelchairs, over which people simply jumped and pushed them," said Armand Versace.
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no impact and that the reactors number 1 and 2 of the nuclear power plant Shika had been shut down.
 It is reported that about 9,400 houses in the region have no water and about 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and rail traffic in the affected areas was disrupted. The Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the Governor-General's office building.
 Three more bombs exploded within two hours near government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured, but no final figures are yet available.
 Both cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples from pets that died after consuming contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other and form crystals that, according to the researchers of the University, can hinder the functioning of the kidneys.
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat urine that had formed through the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals matches the composition found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 I don't know if you knew this, but most goods from Central America came into our country duty-free.
 Nevertheless, eighty percent of our goods were taxed in Central American countries. We take care of you.
 That seemed to me not to be sensible; it was certainly not fair.
 I just tell people that we want to be treated the way we treat others.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of video games that contain violence to minors.
 The bill proposes that video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a "18" rating and that the sale of video games to minors be punishable by a $1,000 fine.
 The Director of Public Prosecutions, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning in which he announced the prosecution of both Huhne and Pryce.
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by MP Ed Davey. It is expected that MP Norman Lamb will take over the job of Economics Minister, which Davey is just leaving.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before Westminster Magistrates Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required reconstructive surgery to his face.
 Uka's weapon had a safety catch when he aimed it at the head of a fifth man. Schneider has since been left with chronic pain, is blind in one eye, and has a missing part of his skull. His face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider said via a video link from a USAF base in his home state.
 In addition to the event on Wednesday, Carpanedo took part in the Championship in two individual races.
 Their first event was the slalom, in which they received a "Did not finish" in their first run. 36 of the 116 competitors achieved the same result in this race.
 Her other race, the giant slalom, she finished in 10th place in the women's group with a combined time of 4:41.30. This was 2:11.60 minutes slower than the first-placed Austrian Claudia Lösch and 1:09.02 minutes faster than Gyöngyi Dani from Hungary, who finished in ninth place.
 Four skiers of the Krückenskifahren did not reach the finish line, and 45 of the total 117 skiers in the giant slalom were not able to place themselves in the race.
 The police of Madhya Pradesh have found the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D. K. Arya said: "We have arrested five persons who raped the Swiss woman and seized her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Solanki said the accused had appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed in, none of them were injured.
 The driver, however, suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while rescue services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first taken to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was meanwhile charged with the murder of her son in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody until the charges are brought and the trial is held, but witness statements may be falsified, as her image has been widely published.
 This is standard practice elsewhere in Britain, but Scottish justice works differently, and the courts have deemed the publication of the photos as potentially harmful.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee notes: "Journalists seem to be crossing a dangerous line when they publish photos etc. of suspects."
 The Crown Office, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that at least until the indictment is issued, no further comments will be made.
 According to the leak, the document refers to the border dispute in which the Palestinians demand a return to the borders before the Six-Day War of 1967.
 Other topics that are allegedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the Jordan Valley for 10 years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian Authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The shooters of the accompanying trial to control the plague should be closely supervised by Rangers, as the trial was monitored and its effectiveness assessed.
 As part of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia (NSW) Inc., qualified volunteers were recruited as part of the Sporting Shooters Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mick O’Flynn, the managing director of Park Conservation and Heritage in the NPWS, the four hunters selected for the first operation received comprehensive safety and training.
 Martelly yesterday swore in a new Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) with nine members.
 It is Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a presidential commission recommended the resignation of the previous CEP as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, some of which have been pending since 2011.
 Over 60 cases of overheating in defective iPods have been reported, resulting in six fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had been informed of 27 accidents involving the devices.
 "Last week, METI announced that it had been informed by Apple of 34 additional cases of overheating, which the company described as 'not serious'."
 The ministry responded by describing the delay in the report by Apple as "really regrettable."
 The earthquake struck Mariana at 07:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Marianas Office of Homeland Security said there were no reported damage in the islands.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there was no indication of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer took tourists from Hong Kong hostage by hijacking their bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines.
 Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists with his M16 rifle.
 Several hostages were rescued and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, as were the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers took the place of an older lady when she had to go to the toilet. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and pursued a medical career.
 He trained as a midwife and took up his work in the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 While working in the hospital, Liggins began to investigate premature labor in his free time.
 His research showed that the application of a hormone accelerated the lung maturation of the fetus.
 Xinhua reported that government investigators recovered two "black box" flight recorders on Wednesday.
 Wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tommy Dreamer said: "Luna was the first Queen of the Extreme. My first manager. Luna died on the night of the two moons. Very unique, just like her. A strong woman.""
 Dustin "Goldust" Runnels commented, "Luna was just as crazy as I was... maybe even crazier... I love her and will miss her... hopefully she's in a better place."
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed before the 2010 federal elections, the proportion of those who oppose Australia becoming a republic has increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister Julia Gillard declared during the election campaign for the Federal election 2010 that in her opinion Australia should become a republic at the end of the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 34 percent of respondents share this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last Australian monarch.
 Twenty-nine percent of respondents said Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31 percent said Australia should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to swim in the Commonwealth Games in the 100 m and 200 m freestyle events and three relay events, but his fitness was in doubt because of his many ailments.
 He was not able to take the required medication to overcome his pain, as they are banned at the Commonwealth Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 Several people confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software in early February and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been a source of water for the Earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and enable life.
 Since comets collided with the Earth long ago, scientists are hoping to gain insights into how planets, particularly the Earth, form.
 Cuomo (53) took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He described the rumors as "political chatter and nonsense."
 It is speculated that he could run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system the FAA claims will allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel and reduce carbon emissions each year.
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older ground-based radar technology to enable air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more accurately and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 No additional transportation is provided and the surface trains do not stop at Wembley. There are no parking facilities or park-and-ride facilities available on site.
 With the concern over lack of transportation, the likelihood grew that the game would have to be played behind closed doors without the fans of the team.
 A study published Thursday in the journal Science reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within just two generations, although it was previously thought that this process would take much longer due to the mating between a native Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and the introduced cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can be processed into various forms. It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire that can be twisted and braided. It can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and glued to other metal. It can be made so thin that it was sometimes used to decorate hand-painted pictures, called picture manuscripts, in books, which are called picture manuscripts.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical. One can make an indicator with red cabbage juice.
 The cabbage juice changes its color, depending on how sour or basic (alkaline) the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost their electrons (since hydrogen atoms consist of a proton and an electron).
 Mix the two dry powders together and then shape them with clean, wet hands into a ball.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels strange and forms a kind of protective layer.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, connected to an elaborate sewage system.
 Remains of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities on Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Even in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were toilets. In Roman culture, toilets were sometimes part of public bathhouses, which men and women visited in mixed company.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it almost immediately back down to the ground.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view a little.
 It takes a giant rocket with a height of more than 100 feet to shoot a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The wheel has changed the world in an incredible way. The greatest service that the wheel has given us is much easier and faster transport.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats (including feral cats) that eat much smaller prey such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that it does not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social cats. They live in large groups called prides.
 The packs consist of one to three related adult males and up to thirty females and young.
 Women usually have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave in a similar way to wolf or dog packs, animals that surprisingly resemble lions (but not other big cats) in their behavior and are just as deadly to their prey.
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb (albeit not particularly well), swim, jump great distances and pull with the five times the strength of a strong man.
 The tiger is in the same group (genus Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These four cats are the only ones that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger does not sound like the full-throated roar of the lion, but rather like a sentence of growled words.
 Ocelots eat small animals. When they can, they prey on monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds. Almost all the animals that the ocelot hunts are significantly smaller than it is.
 Scientists think that ocelots use their sense of smell to track and detect prey. They sniff where they have been on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and move unnoticed. Ocelots hunt their prey by blending in with their surroundings and then pouncing on their prey.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) is separated from the main population from which it came (for example, if it moves across a mountain range or river, or if it moves to a new island so that it cannot easily return), they will often find themselves in a different environment than before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new population needs different features or adaptations to be a strong competitor than what it needed before.
 The original population has not changed at all. It still needs the same adaptations as before.
 Over time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, and then it looks less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, two populations then look so different that they can no longer be assigned to the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the emergence of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence and a very important part of evolution.
 Plants generate oxygen that humans breathe in, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale (that is, breathe out).
 Plants produce their food through photosynthesis using the sun. They also provide shade.
 We build our houses out of plants and make clothes out of plants. We eat mostly plants. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the largest predator of its time, so it feared nothing except other Mosasaurus.
 His long jaws were equipped with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, in addition to another set in the palate, which meant that there was no escape for any animal that crossed his path.
 We don't know for sure, but he might have had a forked tongue. He ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and may have even been a cannibal.
 He also grabbed anything that came into the water; even a large dinosaur like the T. Rex was no match for him.
 While most of their food will be familiar to us, the Romans did have their share of strange or unusual feasts, including wild boar, peacock, snails and a type of rodent called a dormouse.
 Another difference was that the poor and women ate their meals sitting on stools, while the rich men preferred to hold joint banquets, where they lay on their sides while they ate their meals.
 Courts of ancient Rome could not contain foods that came to Europe from America or Asia in later centuries.
 They had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cocoa, and no Roman ever ate a turkey.
 The Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which was considered the house of the god.
 They offered sacrifices to the gods and the priests tried to fulfill the will of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open temple courtyard and then an inner sanctuary, which could only be entered by priests.
 Sometimes special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses did not have such great significance.
 The majority of the Hebrew family's life took place outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard. Shops consisted of open shop fronts. Stone was used for building houses.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated. In the old Norse sagas it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder and when he continued westward he found Greenland and gave it the name Greenland.
 But regardless of his discovery, Eskimo tribes lived there at that time.
 Although all the countries were "Scandinavian", there were many differences between the people, the kings, the customs and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you have seen the movie "The Treasure of the Templars", you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 That is not true. Although there is something written on the back of the document, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence are the words "original Declaration of Independence, dated July 4, 1776." The text is upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one knows for sure who wrote it, it is known that the large parchment document (which measures 29¾ inches x 24½ inches) was rolled up at the beginning of its life for storage.
 So it is possible that the remark was simply added as a label.
 The D-Day landings and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the south was still not free.
 "It was ruled by the 'Vichy' French. These were Frenchmen who had made peace with the Germans in 1940 and were working with the conquerors rather than fighting them."
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France; the invasion was called Operation Dragoon.
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation troops had liberated the south of France and turned towards Germany.
 A civilization is a distinct culture shared by a significantly large group of people who live and work together, a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city state and also somehow defines the size of a society.
 City-states are the precursors of nations. A civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge across several generations, a lasting cultural footprint and a proper distribution.
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical evidence and fail to be recognized as full-fledged civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the 13 states formed a weak central government based on the Articles of Confederation, which consisted only of Congress.
 Congress was not empowered to levy taxes, and since there was neither a national executive nor a national judiciary, it relied on the state governments to enforce all of its laws, which often did not cooperate.
 He also had no authority to suspend tax laws and tariffs between the states.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all states before they could be amended, and the states took the central government so little seriously that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German national football team, the second most successful in the world and was the 2006 FIFA World Cup champion.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions and Italians compete in international competitions and the Olympic Games.
 Japan has approximately 7,000 islands (with Honshu being the largest), making it the seventh largest island in the world.
 "Because of the cluster/group of islands, Japan, is geographically often referred to as an ""archipelago""."
 The beginning of Taiwan goes back to the 15th century, when European sailors passed by there and documented the name of the island as Ilha Formosa or beautiful island.
 1624 The Dutch East India Company establishes a settlement in southwestern Taiwan, initiating a change in the rice farming methods of the aboriginal people and employing Chinese workers on its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) forces took control of western and northern coastal regions of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, in which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the Sun Temple and the Room of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of what they originally looked like.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most widely used image format in the world is 35 mm, which corresponds to the predominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its image format has been adopted by digital camera image sensors.
 In fact, the so-called 35mm format measures confusingly 36mm wide and 24mm high.
 The aspect ratio of this format (divided by twelve, to get the simplest integer ratio) is therefore referred to as 3:2.
 Many common formats (the APS format family, for example) have exactly the same or a very similar aspect ratio.
 The much-maligned and often derided Rule of Thirds is a simple guideline that creates dynamism while maintaining a measure of order in an image.
 It states that the intersection of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally into thirds is the most effective place for the main motif (see example).
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was put to the test.
 For over a thousand years, the Christian religion had held the European nations together despite different languages and customs.
 His omnipotence controlled everyone, from the king to the simple citizen.
 One of the important Christian beliefs is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the money of the churches is there for exactly that reason.
 The central power of the Church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years. This concentration of power and money led many to question whether this principle had been adhered to.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade against Germany.
 The strategy proved effective in cutting off the country from vital military and civilian supplies, even though this blockade violated generally recognized international law codified by several international agreements over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from penetrating entire sea lanes, which was a danger even for neutral ships.
 Since the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response to its unrestricted U-boat warfare.
 In the 1920s, pacifism and isolationism were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the First World War, the nations wanted to avoid a similar situation in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America to take a job with the Edison Company in New York City.
 He came to the United States with 4 cents in his possession, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his supervisor at his previous job) to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique method of indicating different eras. Each time period in China and each family that was in power was a separate dynasty.
 Between the individual dynasties there were also unstable times of divided provinces, the best known of which was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted 60 years between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 In those days, bitter wars were waged among many nobles who fought for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in the history of ancient China, with thousands of people dying in the fight for the highest throne in the grand palace of Xi'an.
 There are a lot of social and political effects like the use of the metric system, a departure from absolutism to republicanism and nationalism, and the belief that the land belongs to the people and not to a ruler alone.
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and best could succeed.
 The same goes for the military, because instead of class-based army ranks, the army ranks were now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution also inspired many oppressed working-class people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was very interested in things beyond this everyday life. He often visited a cave known as "Hira" on the mountain of "Nur" (Light) to meditate.
 The cave itself has survived the ages and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is located at the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, it is not easy to find, even if you know it exists, and once you are inside the cave, you are completely isolated.
 One sees nothing but the clear, beautiful sky above and the numerous surrounding mountains. From the inside of the cave, very little of this world can be seen or heard.
 The Cheops Pyramid is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands today.
 Built in the third century B.C. by the Egyptians, the Cheops Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor deceased pharaohs.
 The Giza Plateau, or the Giza Necropolis, in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings, includes several pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples and the Great Sphinx.
 The large pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built in honor of Cheops' wives and family members.
 The "spread" symbol looks like a V and the "cut" symbol like a bracket or a square with the lower line missing.
 Up means that you should start at the top and push the bow. Down means that you should start at the frog (that's where your hand holds the bow) and pull the bow.
 Stroking generates a softer sound, while scratching is stronger and more expressive.
 You are welcome to add your own pencil markings; just remember that the printed markings are there for musical reasons, and should be respected as such.
 The panicked King Louis the XIV, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two small children (11-year-old Marie-Therese and 4-year-old Louis-Charles) and the King's sister, Madame Elisabeth, were forced by a mob of market women on 6 October 1789 to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a screaming mob of people who shouted threats against the king and queen.
 The mob forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriages wide.
 At some point, a member of the angry crowd held up the head of a royal guard killed in Versailles before the eyes of the horrified queen.
 The war expenditures of the U.S. imperialists in the conquest of the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover the bulk of expenditures, and the interest from bonds flowed through Wall Street banking houses in the name of the Philippine government.
 Of course, the superprofits that came from the continued exploitation of the Filipino people were the basic gains of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the founding of the order.
 The period in which the events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, an era in European history that spans the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000–1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages preceded the Early Middle Ages, followed by the Late Middle Ages, which coincided with 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a broad spectrum of ideas in practice, from technology push or technological imperative to the strict sense that human destiny is determined by an underlying logic associated with scientific laws and their manifestation in technology.
 Most interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas: first, that the development of technology itself follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence, and second, that technology itself has “effects” on societies that are more inherent than social.
 One could argue that the automobile is inevitably associated with the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network for only a small number of cars is not economically viable, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The widespread ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the healthcare industry to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element that drew from writers like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of romanticism, it is geography that shaped individuals. Over time, customs and cultures emerged with reference to this geography and these, since they were in harmony with the place of society, were better than arbitrarily imposed laws.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a center of luxury began around 400 AD and lasted until about 1100 AD.
 Its status declined during the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were considered more valuable than the offerings of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the world's fashion capital also moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak in the period between the 10th and 11th and the 14th century.
 At the beginning, the clothing was strongly influenced by the culture of Byzantium in the East.
 However, the styles in the West are 25 to 30 years behind because of the slow communication channels.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most important developments of the time was that people, as a result of the Crusades, began to use buttons to fasten clothing.
 Subsistence farming is agriculture that aims to produce just enough food to cover the needs of the farmer and his/her family.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, often biological, farming technique that uses saved, indigenous seed from the ecoregion and combines it with intercropping or other relatively simple techniques to maximize yield.
 In the past, most farmers practiced subsistence farming and in many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel neglected by societal norms, and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished from other subcultures in terms of age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or gender of the members.
 The properties that distinguish a subculture as such can be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual or geographical or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a subculture often signal their membership by an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to rely on the few unfortunate cases of children who, due to neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their childhood.
 "Such children are called ""wild"" or feral. Some feral children were held captive by humans (usually their own parents); in some cases, the child's neglect was due to the parents' inability to accept the child's significant intellectual or physical limitations."
 Wolf children may have experienced massive child abuse or traumatic experiences before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Others may have been raised by animals; some may have lived alone in the wild.
 If it was raised completely by animals, the wild child shows behaviors (within the limits of his physical abilities) that are almost completely in accordance with those of his specific caretaker, such as his fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project-based learning should make the learning process easier and more interesting, "scaffolding" goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but rather a support that assists individuals in a novel learning situation, such as when using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 Scaffolding can be both virtual and real. In other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, but so is the little clipboard man in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual assistance is built into the software and is supposed to question, suggest and explain working steps that the student alone might not be able to handle.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse to extortion.
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving and educational, but many are.
 For us, the system of foster care is a piece of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The foster home is supposed to cover all the needs that they did not have in the home from which they were taken.
 The Internet combines elements of mass communication, as well as interpersonal communication.
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the utility and reward approach.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are cited as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 "Personal involvement" and "ongoing relationships" were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord (1998) when they studied audience reactions to Web sites.
 The use of video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of microexpressions, facial movements lasting a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it is claimed that one can tell if someone is lying by correctly interpreting minor changes in facial expression.x
 In his article The President's Speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who have lost the ability to understand language can still correctly assess the honesty of others.
 He even argues that the ability to interpret human behavior may be shared with animals like domestic dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two pools of genetic variation: hidden and expressed.
 Mutation provides new genetic variations and selection removes these from the pool of expressed variations.
 Segregation and recombination mix the variation between the two pools back and forth with each generation.
 Out in the savannah, it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system like ours to meet its amino acid needs from available plant sources.
 In addition, it has serious consequences if one omits it: depression, malnutrition and ultimately death.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes, but these are difficult to digest for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal food sources (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easily digestible, but also provide large amounts of protein that contain all essential amino acids.
 Overall, it should not surprise us that our own ancestors solved their “protein problem” in a similar way to how the chimpanzees in the savannah do today.
 Sleep deprivation is the process of deliberately waking up during normal sleep periods and going to sleep shortly thereafter (10-60 minutes).
 This can be achieved by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to gently wake you up, without fully waking you up.
 If you are someone who sets the alarm clock in your sleep, you can put it on the other side of the room so that you are forced to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Another biorhythm-based option is to drink a lot of liquid before bed (especially water or tea, which is known for its diuretic effect), so that you are forced to get up to urinate.
 The degree of inner peace that a person possesses correlates inversely with the degree of tension in body and mind.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force. Every person has the potential to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment. The only thing that stands in the way of this goal is our own tension and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded by the Mahayana path of love and numerous techniques of Indian Yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It consists of Kundalini Yoga, meditation and the path of all-embracing love.
 Kundalini Yoga awakens the Kundalini energy (awakening energy) through yoga poses, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 The center of Tibetan meditation is the God-Yoga. By visualizing various deities, the energy channels are purified, the chakras are opened and the enlightened consciousness arises.
 Germany was a common enemy in World War II, which led to cooperation between the USSR and the USA. After the war, the clash of systems, the course and the culture led to the countries becoming enemies.
 Two years after the end of the war, the former Allies were now enemies and the Cold War began.
 It was to last the next 40 years and in reality would be fought out on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba and many other places.
 On 17 September 1939, the Polish defence had already collapsed completely and the only hope lay in a retreat and a reorganisation along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans were, however, made obsolete almost overnight when over 800,000 soldiers of the Red Army of the Soviet Union poured into the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts and created them, after they had violated the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties in the eastern regions of Poland.
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method for transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Navy's traditional mission is to ensure that a nation is able to project power, and to deter others from doing so.
 One of the most important recent examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign in the Second World War, when the Americans tried to bring manpower and material across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy tried to stop this traffic mainly with submarines.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have been able to conquer Britain and the rest of Europe.
 Goats were apparently already domesticated in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them as livestock to easily obtain their milk, fur, meat and skin.
 House goats were usually kept in herds that wandered on hillsides or other pasture lands.  They were tended by goatherds, much like the more familiar sheep herders; often these were children or adolescents. These grazing methods are still used today.
 As early as the 16th century, in England, they built support rails.
 Although the support rails were only made of parallel wooden boards, they allowed the horses that pulled the wagons to reach higher speeds and pull larger loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the time.
 Very early on, thresholds were introduced to secure the position of the rails. However, it was gradually recognized that rails that carry a band of iron are more efficient.
 This was common, but the iron caused more wear on the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 Finally, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first fully iron rails were introduced.
 The first known means of transportation was walking. Humans began to walk upright about two million years ago with the emergence of Homo Erectus (which means “upright man”).
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright as regularly.
 Bipedal species are found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have walked upright as early as seven million years ago.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even become activists to alleviate future suffering.
 In many cases, this is just like a symptomatic treatment. If you do not want only temporary solutions, then we should find and treat the root of the problem.
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological advances of humanity and that the problems of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people have become more serious.
 After its adoption by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to the printing shop of John Dunlap.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made overnight, which are now known as the "Dunlap broadsides".
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, who read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy reached London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that remain are the oldest surviving copies of the document, as the original manuscript did not survive the ages.
 Many paleontologists now believe that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still alive today. We call them birds.
 Many do not see them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 Yet many things about birds still look like a dinosaur.
 They have feet with scales and claws, lay eggs and run on both hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Nearly all computers in use today are based on the processing of information that is encoded in the form of binary numbers.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, namely 0 or 1, and these numbers are called binary digits - or bits, to use computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately apparent. The symptoms, for example, vomiting, are so general that one cannot immediately make a diagnosis.
 The best sign of poisoning by swallowing is the presence of an open container of medication or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular poison.
 The term "bug" is used by entomologists in a formal sense for this insect group.
 This term derives from the ancient familiarity with bedbugs. These are insects that are very adaptable in parasitizing humans.
 Both bedbugs and assassin bugs are nidicol, meaning they are adapted to live in the nest or dwelling of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis (MS), making it the most widespread neurological disease in adults of younger and middle age.
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely to develop MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their own interest or in the interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to adopt a plan for their baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can adopt.
 The main goal of science is to find out, with the help of the scientific method, how the world works. This method is indeed the basis of most scientific investigations.
 It is not just about experimentation, where an experiment is a test that is used to eliminate one or more of the possible hypotheses. Scientific research is also guided by asking questions and conducting observations.
 Scientists and philosophers focused on classical texts and especially on the Bible in Latin.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific matters, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of knowledge of the Greek language, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific roots in Greece.
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior are often largely based on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.x
 Behaviours determined by a cycle, which are not only reactions to signals from external cycles, are known in most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that even in the absence of external signals can execute free-running cycles for a while.
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the key pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used phages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They took two experiments, in which they either labeled the phage's DNA with radioactive phosphorus or a protein in the phage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a wide range of effects, depending on what kind of mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether the cells in question are germ cells.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, including wild plants and animals.
 Examples of activities on the ground are hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns by car to go to their workplace and are passed by others whose workplace is at the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic pendulum traffic, all are in some way connected to and support a transport system based on the private car.
 Science now points out that this massive carbon economy has taken the biosphere out of one of its stable states, which has supported human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transportation systems. Almost everyone complains about the transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you will rarely hear complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems lead to such abuses, why do they fail on a daily basis? Are transport engineers simply incompetent, or is something more fundamental going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, the study of traffic flows is difficult, because driver behavior cannot be predicted with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave in a reasonably consistent way; therefore, traffic flows have a certain consistency and can be roughly described mathematically.
 To better represent traffic flow, the relationships between the three most important properties were defined: (1) Flow, (2) Density, and (3) Velocity.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of facilities on the roadway.
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky. Their ability to fly helped them to evade predators more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects can fold their wings along their body.
 This gives them a wider selection of small hiding places where they can hide from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the sun was at the center of the motions of the solar system.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite: that the solar system, including the sun (and even the other stars) moved around the earth.
 That seems reasonable, since it doesn't seem like the earth is moving, does it?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the most water-rich river on Earth, carrying more than eight times as much water as the second largest river.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on earth, sometimes as wide as six miles.
 As much as 20 percent of the water that flows into the oceans from the planet's rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6387 km (3980 miles) long. It takes water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the construction of pyramids of stone continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza were never surpassed in size and the technical perfection of their construction.
 Egyptians in the ancient New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their ancestors, which were then well over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican City has about 800 inhabitants. It is the smallest independent state in the world and the country with the smallest population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for its legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most who work in the state, while Latin is often used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 Basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known to humans since ancient times, as they can all be found in their original form in nature and can be extracted with primitive tools.
 Aristotle, a philosopher, put forward the theory that all things are made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This corresponded more to the four states of aggregation (in the same order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma. He also put forward the theory that they transform into new substances to form what we see.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals. Remember that there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals. Of course there are other metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of non-metallic elements such as carbon.
 The universe is made up of matter. All matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 Consequently, the pencil, after its invention, became a good friend to many people.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed into the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so that it has been pushed back in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come near a pencil sharpener.
 One can be curious to see what will come out of the keyboard when something newer arrives.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that you need energy to combine a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 It's like rolling a heavy car up a hill. When the core splits again, some of this energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable cores, which means that they disintegrate at the slightest or even no provocation.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the mare and thicker under the highlands.
 On the near side, there could be more Maria, since the crust is thinner, making it easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Internal theories focus on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that humans have certain needs and/or desires that are internalized during the course of their adulthood.
 These theories deal with what causes certain people to want exactly the things they do, and what influences in their environment cause them to do certain things or not to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 In general, two behaviors can emerge when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. One end of the spectrum is the attempt to remain “one of the guys” (or one of the girls).
 This type of manager has problems making unpopular decisions, carrying out disciplinary measures, assessing performance, assigning responsibilities and holding employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, you become an unrecognizable individual who has to do everything differently than the team has done and take everything for yourself.
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are run according to the same standards of excellence as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often have the function of a contact point for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, as their teams can meet in different time zones that may not be considered by the local leadership.
 The presence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 "The ""invisible team"" is the management team to which each member reports. The invisible team sets the standards for each member.x"
 Why would an organization undertake the time-consuming process of introducing a learning organization? One goal for the practical implementation of organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all departments of an organization, creativity and ingenuity can emerge.
 As a result, the collective work of an organization in overcoming an obstacle can lead to a new innovative method of meeting customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation, as well as a culture of shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum Concept as a method to help organizations become more effective.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thus defining the research area and making it much more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that different types of brain damage such as trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some brain functions.
 Emerging technologies allow us to see and explore certain brain structures and processes for the first time.
 It provides us with a lot of information and material to build simulation models that help us understand the processes in our head.
 KI is strongly associated with science fiction, but is a major branch of computer science that deals with behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of AI includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are control, the establishment of strategies and time plans, the ability to answer customer diagnoses and questions, as well as handwriting, voice and face recognition.
 Such things have become independent disciplines that focus on finding solutions to problems of real life.
 The AI system is now widely used in business, medicine, engineering and the military, and has been built into numerous software applications for home computers and video games.
 Field trips are an important part of every school class. Not infrequently, a teacher would like to take her students to places that cannot be reached by bus.
 Virtual excursions are a technical solution. The students can view museum pieces from the classroom, visit an aquarium or admire beautiful works of art.
 Sharing an excursion virtually is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website about their trip to the state capital every year. The website is redesigned every year, but the previous versions remain online and serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help improve the writing skills of students. Although students at the beginning of their blogging experience often have sloppy grammar and spelling, this usually changes when there is an audience.
 Since students are often a very critical audience, the blog author makes an effort to improve his writing style to avoid criticism.
 Blogging "forces students to learn more about the world around them." The need to engage the interest of the audience inspires students to write intelligently and interestingly (Toto, 2004).
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to continue learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of blogs "can enable students to become more analytical and critical; by reacting to Internet materials, students can define their positions in the context of other texts and articulate their own perspectives on particular topics" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is Canada's charming, bilingual capital and is distinguished by a number of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara Falls, and to the north the unspoiled beauty of nature in Muskoka and beyond.
 All these things and more make Ontario what outsiders see as typically Canadian.
 Large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that many surprised: There are more African Americans living in the United States than Canada has citizens.
 The East African islands are located in the Indian Ocean off the eastern coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, in terms of wildlife, a continent of its own.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent nations or belong to France and are known as luxurious seaside resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and it was very successful in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when the Portuguese seafarer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the north, the region is bounded by the Sahel zone and in the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 Wearing a ring is also helpful (just not one that looks too expensive.
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider harassment, and that it is not unusual to be followed, grabbed by the arm, etc.
 Stay consistent when rejecting men, and don't be afraid to defend your position (cultural differences be damned; that doesn't mean it's okay!)
 The present-day Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC and was used by the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinides as a strategic port with the name Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Dar el Beida and it was named Casablanca by Spanish traders who established trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina it is easy to find places where traditional Moroccan goods like tagines, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of Tinnef are sold, but that is all for the tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town of the Democratic Republic of the Congo in the extreme east near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the lava of the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's streets, particularly the city center.
 While Goma is reasonably safe, any stay outside of Goma should be carefully planned to learn about the ongoing fighting in the province of North Kivu.
 The city is also the starting point for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas (motorcycle taxis) to get around Goma. The usual (local) price is ~500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.x
 This, combined with its relative inaccessibility, has made "Timbuktu" a metaphor for exotic, far-off lands.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction because of its reputation and has an airport, it is now a poor city.
 In 1990 it was added to the list of endangered World Heritage Sites due to the threat of desert sand.
 It was one of the most important stops of Louis Gates PBS special "Wonders of the African World".
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the country's cities because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeast of South Africa. It borders Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which supports a different animal life.
 It is one of South Africa's main attractions and is regarded as the flagship of South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, the park charges daily conservation and entrance fees.
 It may also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card, which grants access either to selected parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the namesake of the territory of Hong Kong and is the focus of many tourists.
 The buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline were compared with a shimmering bar chart that becomes visible through the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.x
 For the best views of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and drive to the opposite shore of Kowloon.
 Most of the urbanization of Hong Kong Island is densely packed on reclaimed land along the north shore.
 This is the place the British colonists made their own. If you are looking for traces of the area's colonial past, this is a good starting point.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forest in the world and stretch 80 km from the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland to the coast.
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO World Heritage Site. The part of the forest that lies within Indian territory is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests are not just mangrove swamps, however – they also include some of the last remaining stands of the mighty jungle that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km², of which a third is covered by water and marshes.
 The Sundarbans have been a protected area since 1966, and estimates suggest that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer living there.
 Buses run all day from the district-wide bus station (on the other side of the river), with most buses, especially those to the east and Jakar/Bumthang, leaving between 06:30 and 07:30.
 As the buses between the districts are often full, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most districts are served by small Japanese coaster buses, which are comfortable and stable.
 Shared taxis offer a quick and comfortable way to get to nearby places like Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge. It spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Its two towers are 83 meters high, its length is 378 meters and it has two lanes with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The construction work was completed in August 2011, but the opening for traffic was not until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs posts are expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní were the most important indigenous group inhabiting present-day eastern Paraguay. They lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers who also practiced subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was also home to other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the Great Province of the West Indies, was created in the 16th century as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups.
 The Spaniards began the colonization period, which lasted three centuries.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year takes place in December on Las Cañitas polo fields.
 Smaller tournaments and competitions can also be watched at other times of the year.x
 Information on competitions and sales points for polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Pound (FKP), whose value is fixed in line with the value of the British Pound (GBP).
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the island, which is located in Stanley opposite the FIC West Store.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands and at Stanley credit cards. US dollars are also often accepted.
 On the remote islands, credit cards are probably not accepted, although British and US currency may be accepted; check with the owners in advance to find out which method of payment is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before leaving the island.
 Since Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures above +30 ° C are common.
 Winter can be deceivingly cool: Temperatures rarely go below freezing, but wind and humidity make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no distinct rainy or dry seasons: The amount of precipitation remains about the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, the wild animals are still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the Park Authority, visitors should keep at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves and 25 yards/meters away from all other wild animals!
 No matter how peaceful bison, elk, bears and practically all large animals may appear, they can still attack.
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year because they don't keep enough distance. These animals are big, wild and possibly dangerous, so give them enough space.
 Also be aware that smells can attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking strongly scented foods and keep a clean camp.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1750s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The harbor was the scene of an ignominious standoff of the Navy in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain refused to leave the harbor.
 All ships except for a British cruiser were sunk. Nearly 200 Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau-Movement organised independence struggle, a peaceful gathering in the town led to the killing of the paramount chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Since Auckland stretches over two harbours, there are many beaches. The most popular beaches are in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore (in the district of North Harbour) are located on the Pacific Ocean and extend from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 Almost all are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most provide shade, which is provided by Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki Drive are located at the port of Waitemata, in the upscale suburbs of Mission Bay and St. Heliers in Central Auckland.
 There are family beaches, which are sometimes overcrowded, with a beautiful shopping promenade along the coast. Swimming is safe here.
 The most important local beer is "Number One". It is not a complex beer, but pleasant and refreshing. The other local beer is called "Manta".
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps more palatable.
 The local tap water is safe to drink, but if you are concerned, bottled water is also readily available.
 "For Australians, the idea of a coffee ""Flat White"" is foreign. A small espresso is ""espresso"", cappuccino is filled high with milk (not foam) and tea is served without milk."
 The hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juices are expensive, but excellent.
 Many diving trips take place throughout the year and injuries due to any of these causes on the reef are rare.
 However, you should follow the advice of authorities, pay attention to all signs and, in particular, pay attention to safety warnings.
 Squid occur in the vicinity of beaches and near river mouths from October to April north of 1770. They can occasionally occur outside of this time frame.
 Sharks exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and would swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live actively in the sea, their primary habitat is in river mouths north of Rockhampton.
 A booking in advance gives the traveler the assurance that he will have a place to stay when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have arrangements with specific hotels, although you may also be able to book other accommodation, such as camping, through a travel agency.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you, in case you need time to reconsider the offer or to get additional documents for your travel destination (e.g. visa).
 Any changes or queries should be directed to the travel agency and not directly to the hotel.
 At some festivals, the vast majority of festival-goers decide to camp on site, and most visitors consider this an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you have to get there early to get a camping spot near the music.
 Remember that on parts of the festival, music will still be playing well into the night, even though the music on the main stages has stopped.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you cross the northern Baltic in winter, check the position of the cabin, as the breaking of ice causes quite horrible noise for those most affected.
 The cruises to St. Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement (see conditions).
 Casinos are usually very concerned to keep guests as long as possible on the spot and to let them spend a lot of money. There are usually neither windows nor clocks, and exits are sometimes hard to find.
 They usually have a special offer of food, drink and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to make sure they stay.
 Some venues offer free alcoholic drinks. However, intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Whoever wants to drive in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing.
 On icy and snowy roads, liability is low and one cannot drive as if one were on bare asphalt.
 In snowstorms, so much snow can fall in a very short time that one can get stuck.
 The visibility can also be impaired by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.x
 On the other hand, icy and snowy conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic runs almost continuously throughout the year.
 Safaris are perhaps the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari in common usage refers to a land trip to observe the overwhelming African wildlife, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach cars closely, and the standard equipment allows a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are often shy and you can see them better with a pair of binoculars.
 A foot safari (also called bushwalk, trek or footing) is a hike that lasts either a few hours or several days.
 The Paralympics will take place from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events being held at other venues across Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic Summer Games, after having already hosted the Games in 1964.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you could find yourself in a difficult situation.
 Cancellation policies vary, but by the end of March, most cancellation policies were waived because of the Coronavirus until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled to be held.
 It is estimated that most tickets for the event will cost between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, with an average ticket costing around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing damp clothes can help dry them. Many hotels provide ironing boards and irons, even if you are not in the room.
 If an iron is not available or one does not want to wear ironed socks, one can try using a hair dryer if one is available.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (this can cause it to shrink or in extreme cases cause burns).
 There are various methods of purifying water. Some of them prove to be more effective in counteracting certain dangers.
 In some areas, it is enough to boil water for one minute, in others it must be several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter pests that they are not familiar with from their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritations or, in the worst case, even trigger allergic reactions, poison or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can injure or kill humans with violence are not usually classified as pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy goods that are exempt from certain taxes and consumption taxes in certain places.
 Travellers whose destination country has high taxes can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, particularly on products such as alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Highway is the greatest driving challenge, as it often leads through remote, uninhabited terrain.
 If you are not used to driving on country roads, stay alert: steep slopes, narrow roads and sharp curves predominate here.
 The speed limits given are noticeably lower than in the preceding and following sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and their strict observance is even more important than usual.
 Yet interestingly, mobile phone coverage here is much better than in many other areas of the route, such as the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baked goods are quite tasty. In Bavaria they are quite rich and varied, as well as with the southern neighbor Austria.
 Fruit cakes are widespread, with apples being baked into cakes all year round and cherries and plums being used in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts or other nuts. Popular cakes often go particularly well with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want to make small but rich pastries, try what is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, along with either meat or vegetables.
 A curry can be either "dry" or "wet" depending on the amount of liquid used.
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries; in southern India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 With a choice of 17,000 islands, Indonesian food is an umbrella term that encompasses a huge variety of regional cuisines found across the country.
 However, when the term is used without further attributes, it usually refers to the food that originally came from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, which is now widespread throughout the island group, offers a variety of simply seasoned dishes. The Javanese prefer to use peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut blossom sugar) and a range of aromatic spices as flavorings.
 Martingales are aids for the feet of riders, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet may get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off a horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse runs through. To keep this risk as low as possible, a number of safety precautions can be taken.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a smooth, rather narrow sole.
 In addition, some saddles, particularly English saddles, have safety stirrups that allow a stirrup leather to fall from the saddle as soon as it is pulled backwards by a falling rider.
 The Cochamó Valley – Chile's most important climbing destination, known as the Yosemite National Park of South America, with a variety of large granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view. Climbers from all over the world discover new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 Downhill sports such as skiing and snowboarding are popular sports in which one attaches skis or a snowboard to his feet and descends a snow-covered surface.
 Skiing is a popular travel activity with many enthusiasts, occasionally known as "ski bums", who plan their entire holiday around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old – cave paintings with depictions of skiers go back to 5000 BC!
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the 17th century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski club in Australia was founded by Norwegians.
 Ski hiking with a backpack: This activity is also called ski touring or ski hiking.
 It resembles alpine touring skiing or mountaineering, but does not necessarily include it, since the latter is done in steep terrain and requires much stiffer skis and boots.
 Consider the ski route like a comparable hiking route.
 With good conditions, you are able to cover somewhat larger distances than when hiking – only very rarely will you reach the speed of cross-country skiing on well-maintained trails without a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but has numerous independent countries. Normally, one would have to apply for several visas and go through several passport controls if one wanted to travel through several countries.
 The Schengen area, however, works in this respect a little like a country.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can normally cross the borders without having to go through passport control again.
 Accordingly, you do not need to apply for a visa for each of the Schengen member states individually, which saves time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universally accepted definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax authorities define antiques as goods over 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical variations, where the age limit may be lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade products could be called "antique" even though they are younger than similar products from mass production.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture surrounding the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Even in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer on a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar. They kept reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions. Tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 "Even if the term 'gypsy' is used mainly by non-Roma, it is often perceived as offensive, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of the Roma."
 If a travel advisory is issued for the country you are visiting, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments than your own, but their advice is tailored to their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Consultations are merely a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general and too much simplified in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere.
 A storm is the collective term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption or loss of human life.
 Weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types of weather that depend on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of weather, as well as thunderstorms, tornadoes, flash floods and tornadoes.
 Regional and seasonal weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to be aware of any type of weather that affects their area, as this can affect all travel plans.
 Anyone planning to travel to a country that is considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 "A search on the Internet for ""Course on hostile environments"" will probably display the address of a local company."
 A course covers all the problems discussed here in much greater detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course is usually between 2 and 5 days long and includes role-playing, a lot of first aid and sometimes weapons training.
 There are numerous books and journals on survival in the wilderness, but few publications on war zones.
 Travellers planning to have a sex reassignment surgery abroad should ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return journey.
 The willingness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender (X) or documents that have been updated to the desired name and gender varies.
 The willingness of foreign governments to recognize these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security checks have also become much more intrusive in the time after September 11, 2001.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be respected when passing through scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning flow of waves breaking on the beach, often at reefs or the like.
 Because of the underwater topography, the backflow concentrates in a few deeper areas and a rapid current can form there to deep water.
 Most deaths occur from exhaustion while trying to swim against the current, which can prove impossible.
 When you get out of the current, swimming back is not more difficult than normal.
 Try to get somewhere where you won't be caught again. Alternatively, depending on your abilities and whether you were noticed, you might have to wait for rescue.
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock (the honeymoon phase is not so pronounced), lasts longer and can be more serious.
 Travelers who find it easy to adapt to the new culture sometimes find it particularly difficult to adapt to their home culture.
 When you come home from a stay abroad, you have adapted to a different culture and dropped some of your home country's behaviour.
 When you first traveled abroad, people were probably patient and understanding because they knew travelers have to adjust to a new country.
 One might not expect that even returning travelers require patience and understanding.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and while it is quiet before the show starts.
 Normally, you can hear the sounds of tourists and vendors all the time. The history of the sounds and the lights is just like a story book.
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the pyramids, with the various pyramids being illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations, with sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest is King George Island with the settlement Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other islands are Livingston Island and Deception, where the flooded caldera of an active volcano provides a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the peninsula bounded by Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long chain of the Ellsworth Mountains, which is divided by the Minnesota Glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel Range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, whose highest peak is the Mount Vinson at 4,892 m (16,050 ft).
 In remote areas without cell phone coverage, a satellite phone may be the only option.
 A satellite phone is generally not a replacement for a mobile phone, since you have to be outside and in clear view of a satellite in order to make a call.
 The service is frequently used by ships, including pleasure craft, as well as expeditions that require data and voice communications.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you more information about the connection to this service.
 An increasingly popular option for people planning to take a year out is to study and take courses abroad.
 This is particularly popular with school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before university without their studies being affected.
 In many cases, participation in an overseas gap year program can actually improve your chances of getting into college in your home country.
 Usually, a fee is charged for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a great destination for boating. The “Land of a thousand lakes” also has thousands of islands – in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 For the Archipelago and lakes you do not necessarily need a yacht.
 Even if the coastal island groups and the largest lakes are actually large enough for any yacht, smaller boats or even kayaks offer a different experience.
 Boating is the national leisure activity in Finland, with every sixth or eighth person owning a boat.
 This is comparable to Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but otherwise quite unique (in the Netherlands, for example, the ratio is one to forty.)
 Most pure Baltic Sea cruises include a longer stay in St. Petersburg in Russia.
 This means that you can visit the historic city for several whole days, while returning in the evening and spending the night on the ship.
 If you only go on land during the cruise, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Some cruises offer Berlin in Germany as a destination in their brochures. As you can see on the map above, Berlin is far from the sea, and a visit to the city is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Air travel can be a frightening experience for people of any age and from any walk of life, especially if they have never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 There is no need to be ashamed of this: it is nothing more than the personal fears and antipathies that many people have.
 Learning more about how airplanes work and the procedures during a flight can help some people overcome the fear associated with the unknown or the feeling of not having any control.
 Courier firms are well paid for the fast delivery of things. Often, time is a very important factor in business documents, commercial goods or spare parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the larger firms use their own aircraft, but on other routes and with smaller firms, difficulties arose.
 When they shipped things by air freight, the unloading and customs clearance on some routes could take several days.
 The only way to get it through faster was to send it as unaccompanied baggage. The airline regulations do not allow baggage to be sent without a passenger, and that is where you come in.
 The obvious method of flying first or business class is to pay a thick wad of cash for the privilege (or, better still, get your own company to pay for it).
 That is not cheap: As a rough rule of thumb, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare for business class and up to 11 times for first class!
 In general, it is pointless to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B even for business or first class seats.
 Airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of flyers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting to their destination quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The native language is Romanian, but many people also speak Russian.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered ethnic conflicts.
 This conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in eastern Moldova in 1994, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, the economic relations between these two parts of the Republic of Moldova could be restored.
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Christian Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is now a modern, progressive and busy business centre, situated on a vast bay and surrounded by mountains.
 The broad boulevards, glass-fronted buildings and modern shopping centres are punctuated by classic red-tiled roofs, the 18th-century market and old mosques and churches, although the city has a more Mediterranean European feel than the traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík offers views of the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 On the cemetery there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons on some graves.
 It is worthwhile to stroll through the fascinating village for half an hour.
 In the north and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which became known to foreigners after Lord Byron had described its beauty in vivid colors.
 The Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Cabo da Roca and Sintra.
 Also visit the great shrine of Our Lady of the Rosary of Fatima (pilgrimage site) in the north – a place that is world-famous for its Marian apparitions.
 Please remember that you are visiting a mass grave and a place that is of almost incalculable importance to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived their time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered or worked to death there, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this site with the dignity, respect and reverence it deserves. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not deface the site by adding or scratching graffiti.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants speak Catalan, the vast majority understand it, and almost everyone can speak Spanish.
 Most signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first official language.
 Nevertheless, Spanish is also widespread in public transport and other facilities.
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan on the metro, but unforeseen disruptions are reported by an automated system in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Even if this is often an inaccurate cliché, one finds oneself in Paris best if one shows one's best side and behaves like someone who is "bien élevé" (well-bred). This will make it much easier to get along.
 The Parisian's harsh exterior disappears very quickly when you show basic manners.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, with mainly beech, spruce and fir trees, and offers a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 Thanks to its numerous microclimates, different soils and alternating altitudes, it has a remarkably large diversity of plant communities.
 The area is also home to an extremely large variety of animal and bird species.
 There are rare fauna such as European brown bears, wolves, eagles, owls, lynx, wild cats and hazel grouse as well as many commonly occurring species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach the knees and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries there are indeed wrap dresses for women who come unprepared, but if you bring your own, especially one in bright colors, the monk or nun at the entrance will give you a smile.
 Similarly, men must wear pants that reach the knees.
 These can also be borrowed from the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable in these dresses. For all men there is a standard size!
 The cuisine of Mallorca is based, as in similar areas of the Mediterranean, on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork) and always uses olive oil.
 A simple popular dinner, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli: Bread with olive oil, tomatoes and any available ingredient such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 "All nouns start with a capital letter next to the word you for ""you"" always, even in the middle of a sentence."
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 It makes reading easier, but writing is somewhat difficult because one has to determine whether a verb or a noun is used as the main word.
 Italian pronunciation is relatively easy, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The most important letters to pay attention to are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 "Also, pay attention to the difference between r and rr: caro means "love", while carro means "chariot.""
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and largely regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this introductory grammar would help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the sentences.
 If you speak a romance language, it is of course easier to learn Portuguese.
 People who speak some Spanish might be tempted to think that Portuguese is so similar that it does not need to be learned separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are nowadays usually no longer in operation and serve as museums or educational sites.
 Since light pollution was not as much of a problem during their heyday as it is today, they are usually located in cities or university campuses, which are easier to access than those built in more recent times.
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 Viewing cherry blossoms, known as hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept originated in China, where peach blossoms were the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first cherry blossom festivals were held by the emperor only for himself and other members of the royal family in the vicinity of the imperial court.
 "Plants look their best in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one."
 If you visit a formally laid out garden and take "samples", you will also be thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, and you can find your way around easily and buy almost anything after you arrive.
 Since you are in the extreme tropics and only a few degrees north of the equator, you have to reckon with both heat (always) and strong sun (when the sky is clear, less often).
 There are also a few buses that go north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are taking goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good basis for planning a holiday.
 For example, castle tours in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley or a cruise to interesting cities on the Danube or a boat trip along the Erie Canal.
 They also represent popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have been adopted by non-believers in Christian and non-Christian countries around the world.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter night at some open place to see the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian-theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday evening, during the Easter weekend, with the celebrations of the congregations often beginning at midnight, when the resurrection of Christ is celebrated.
 All animals that originally arrived on the islands came either by swimming, flying or by being washed ashore.
 Due to the great distance from the continent, mammals were not able to make the journey, which made the giant tortoise the main prey on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since the first humans set foot on the Galapagos Islands, many mammals have been introduced, including goats, horses, rats, cats and dogs.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you will experience polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This provides a good opportunity to see the Northern Lights, as the sky is more or less dark all the time.
 Since the areas are sparsely populated and light pollution is often not a problem, you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 Suits are part of the standard business attire and colleagues address each other by their family names or job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is of crucial importance, with the focus being on group performance rather than on praise for individual achievements.
 Often, employees must seek approval from their supervisors for all decisions they make, and they are expected to follow their bosses' instructions unconditionally.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.44033865887174645, 'precisions': [0.7267932907728301, 0.5051431404139298, 0.37064022418624704, 0.276292656538791], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.020144816148214, 'translation_length': 25219, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 68.62438946391461, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}